Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-1923.02
State Fire Marshal; fire code enforcement and regulations; submit for review.

The State Fire Marshal shall submit to the Government, Military and Veterans Affairs Committee of the Legislature all fire code enforcement and regulations relating to child care facilities for review once every five years.

Laws 2024, LB874, § 8.